Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3841
(UTC 415) Reformation to correct mistakes.

(UTC 415) The court may reform the terms of a trust, even if unambiguous, to conform the terms to the settlor's intention if it is proved by clear and convincing evidence that both the settlor's intent and the terms of the trust were affected by a mistake of fact or law, whether in expression or inducement.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 41.

A document by which a settlor purports to revoke a revocable trust is a term of that trust. In re Trust Created by Isvik, 274 Neb. 525, 741 N.W.2d 638 (2007).

Absent clear and convincing evidence that a settlor's stated intent to revoke her trust was a product of mistake, the trust was revoked and ceased to exist. In re Trust Created by Isvik, 274 Neb. 525, 741 N.W.2d 638 (2007).

A document by which a settlor purports to revoke a revocable trust is a term of that trust within the meaning of this section. In re Trust of O'Donnell, 19 Neb. App. 696, 815 N.W.2d 640 (2012).